Maryland, session 2026, HB0981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–206.2.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY THAT IS
AN INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY, AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY,
OR A COMBINATION INVESTOR–OWNED GAS AND ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(B) (1) IN A BASE RATE PROCEEDING TO SET JUST AND REASONABLE
RATES FOR A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY UNDER THIS TITLE, THE COMMISSION
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0981*

HOUSE BILL 981
SHALL DETERMINE THE CURRENT AVERAGE EXPECTED 10–YEAR UNITED STATES
EQUITY MARKET RETURN.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL USE MULTIPLE OBJECTIVE SOURCES TO
DETERMINE THE EQUITY MARKET RETURN UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(C) THE COMMISSION MAY ADJUST RATES FOR A PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY BASED ON THE RISKS TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY AS COMPARED
TO THE EQUITY MARKET RETURN DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.